Maine, session 132, LD973.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Community Partnerships with Public School Systems Grant Program
The Community Partnerships with Public School Systems Grant Program is established
in the department to encourage the creation of partnerships between public and private
colleges and universities, community action agencies or equivalent agencies and public
school systems. The program must provide grants for the purpose of offering services and
addressing issues related to mental health, public health, staff development or other issues
identified by the community or schools.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School and Community Partnerships N502
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for grants to public schools and community partners
including colleges and universities, community action agencies or other equivalent
agencies for the purpose of offering services and addressing issues related to mental health,
public health, staff development or other issues identified by the community or schools.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $0